Washington statutes.
RCW 36.69.220

L.I.D.'s—Procedure when by resolution.

If the board of park and recreation commissioners desires to initiate the formation of a local improvement district by resolution, it shall first pass a resolution declaring its intention to order such improvement, setting forth the nature and territorial extent of such proposed improvement, designating the number of the proposed local improvement district and describing the boundaries thereof, stating the estimated cost and expense of the improvement and the proportionate amount thereof which will be borne by the property within the proposed district, and fixing a date, time and place for a public hearing on the formation of the proposed local district.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.69.220. Prior: 1957 c 58 s 23.]